fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-D-mîpit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mîpit - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, tooth	AEW V-initial NDI1

     mîpit+N+I+D+PxX+Sg: mîpit
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg: nîpit
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg: kîpit
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg: nîpitinân
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg: kîpitinaw
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg: kîpitiwâw
     
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg: wîpit
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg: wîpitiwâw
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: wîpitiyiw

     mîpit+N+I+D+PxX+Pl: mîpita
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl: nîpita
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl: kîpita
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl: nîpitinâna
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl: kîpitinawa
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl: kîpitiwâwa
     
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl: wîpita
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl: wîpitiwâwa
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: wîpitiyiwa

     mîpit+N+I+D+PxX+Loc: mîpitihk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Loc: nîpitihk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Loc: kîpitihk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Loc: nîpitinâhk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Loc: kîpitinâhk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Loc: kîpitiwâhk

     mîpit+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Loc: wîpitihk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Loc: wîpitiwâhk
     mîpit+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: wîpitiyihk

     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Sg:      [mîpicis,     mîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nîpicis,     nîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kîpicis,     kîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nîpicisinân, nîpicisisinân]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kîpicisinaw, kîpicisisinaw]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kîpicisiwâw, kîpicisisiwâw]

     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Sg:    [wîpicis,     wîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Sg:    [wîpicisiwâw, wîpicisisiwâw]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [wîpicisiyiw, wîpicisisiyiw]

     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+PxX+Pl:      [mîpicisa,     mîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nîpicisa,     nîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kîpicisa,     kîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nîpicisinâna, nîpicisisinâna]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kîpicisinawa, kîpicisisinawa]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kîpicisiwâwa, kîpicisisiwâwa]
     
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Sg+Pl:    [wîpicisa,      wîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px3Pl+Pl:    [wîpicisiwâwa,  wîpicisisiwâwa]
     mîpit+N+I+D+Der/Dim+N+I+D+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [wîpicisiyiwa,  wîpicisisiyiwa]
